Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3223
Fiscal year; audit; filing; failure to file; withhold funds.

The fiscal year of the district shall begin July 1 and end June 30. The board of directors, at the close of each year's business, shall cause an audit of the books, records and financial affairs of the district to be made by a public accountant or firm of such accountants, who shall be selected by the district. The audit shall be in a form prescribed by the Auditor of Public Accounts. Such audits shall show (1) the gross income from all sources of the district for the previous year; (2) the amount expended during the previous year for maintenance; (3) the amount expended during the previous year for improvements and other such programs, including detailed information on bidding and notices of requests for bids and the disposition thereof; (4) the amount of depreciation of the property of the district during the previous year; (5) the number of employees as of June 30 of each year; (6) the salaries paid employees; and (7) all other facts necessary to give an accurate and comprehensive view of the cost of operating, maintaining, and improving the district.

An authenticated copy of the audit shall be filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts within six months after the end of the fiscal year. Upon the failure by the district to file the audit report within such time, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall notify the county treasurer or treasurers within the district who shall withhold distribution of all tax funds to which the district may be entitled pursuant to section 2-3225.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 23, p. 114;

Laws 1972, LB 107, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 404, § 3.